Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle A. Acquisition and Ownership of State Trust Company Facilities and Other Real Estate.

§ 81-27-5.001.
Investment in state trust company facilities.

In this subarticle, “state trust company facility” means real estate, including an improvement, owned, or leased to the extent the lease or the leasehold improvements are capitalized, by a state trust company for the purpose of:

Providing space for state trust company employees to perform their duties and space for parking by state trust company employees and customers;

Conducting trust business, including meeting the reasonable needs and convenience of the state trust company’s customers, computer operations, document and other item processing, maintenance and record retention and storage;

Holding, improving, and occupying as an incident to future expansion of the state trust company’s facilities; or

Conducting another activity authorized by rules or regulations adopted under this chapter.

Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, a state trust company may not directly or indirectly invest an amount in excess of its restricted capital in state trust company facilities, furniture, fixtures, and equipment. Except as otherwise provided by rules or regulations adopted under this chapter, in computing this limitation a state trust company:

Shall include:

Its direct investment in state trust company facilities;

Any investment in equity or investment securities of a company holding title to a facility used by the state trust company for the purposes specified by subsection (a) of this section;

Any loan made by the state trust company to or on the security of equity or investment securities issued by a company holding title to a facility used by the state trust company; and

Any indebtedness incurred on state trust company facilities by a company:

That holds title to the facility;

That is an affiliate of the state trust company; and

In which the state trust company is invested in the manner described by subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph (1); and

May exclude an amount included under paragraphs (1)(B) through (D) of this subsection to the extent any lease of a facility from the company holding title to the facility is capitalized on the books of the state trust company.

Real estate acquired under subsection (a)(3) of this section and not improved and occupied by the state trust company ceases to be a state trust company facility on the third anniversary of the date of its acquisition, unless the commissioner on application grants written approval to further delay in the improvement and occupation of the property by the state trust company.

A state trust company shall comply with generally accepted accounting principles, consistently applied, in accounting for its investment in and depreciation of state trust company facilities, furniture, fixtures, and equipment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.002.
Other real estate.

A state trust company may not acquire real estate except:

As permitted by Section 81-27-5.001 or as otherwise provided by this chapter, including rules or regulations adopted under this chapter;

If necessary to avoid or minimize a loss on a loan or investment previously made in good faith; or

With the prior written approval of the commissioner.

To the extent reasonably necessary to avoid or minimize loss on real estate acquired as permitted by subsection (a) of this section, a state trust company may exchange real estate for other real estate or personal property, invest additional funds in or improve real estate acquired under this subsection or subsection (a) of this section, or acquire additional real estate.

A state trust company shall dispose of any real estate subject to subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section not later than:

The fifth anniversary of the date:

It was acquired, except as otherwise provided by rules or regulations adopted under this chapter; or

It ceases to be used as a state trust company facility; or

The third anniversary of the date it ceases to be a state trust company facility as provided by Section 81-27-5.001(c).

The commissioner on application may grant one or more extensions of time for disposing of real estate if the commissioner determines that:

The state trust company has made a good faith effort to dispose of the real estate; or

Disposal of the real estate would be detrimental to the state trust company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.